Idaho, session 2026, H0964.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $255,800 $255,800
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 170,500 170,500
TOTAL $426,300 $426,300
II. FISHERIES:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $46,000 $46,000
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 7,486,100 7,486,100
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 1,970,100 1,970,100
TOTAL $9,502,200 $9,502,200


FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
III. WILDLIFE:
FROM:
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund $500,000 $500,000
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 3,750,000 3,750,000
TOTAL $4,250,000 $4,250,000
GRAND TOTAL $13,752,200 $426,300 $14,178,500
SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR DEDICATED FUNDS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Fish and Game any unexpended and
unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department
of Fish and Game from dedicated funds for the Administration, Fisheries,
Wildlife, and Communications programs for fiscal year 2026 to be used for
nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR FEDERAL FUNDS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Fish and Game any unexpended
and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Depart-
ment of Fish and Game from federal funds for the Administration, Fisheries,
Wildlife, and Communications programs for fiscal year 2026 to be used for
nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. USE OF APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding any law to the con-
trary, of the moneys appropriated in Section 1 of this act, $200,000 from
the Fish and Game (Other) Fund shall be used to enhance wolf trapping to man-
age wolf predation. The balance of the $200,000 not expended for this pur-
pose shall revert to the fund. The Department of Fish and Game shall provide
a report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee detailing the use of
funds by June 30, 2027. The format and content of this report will be de-
termined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.


SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.